North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 3. Discovery and Reclamation.

§ 146-16.
Department of Administration to supervise.

The Department of Administration shall be responsible for discovering, inventorying, surveying, and reclaiming the vacant and unappropriated lands, swamplands, and lands acquired by the State by virtue of being sold for taxes, and shall take all measures necessary to that end. All expenses incurred in the performance of these activities shall be paid from the State Land Fund, unless otherwise provided by the General Assembly.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-17.
Mapping and discovery agreements.

The Department of Administration, acting on behalf of the State, for the purpose of discovering State lands, may, with the approval of the Governor and Council of State, enter into agreements with counties, municipalities, persons, firms, and corporations providing for the discovery of State land by the systematic mapping of the counties of the State and by other appropriate means. All expenses incurred by the Department incident to such mapping and discovery agreements shall be paid from the State Land Fund, unless otherwise provided by the General Assembly.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-17.1.
Rewards; reclamation of certain State lands; wrongful removal of timber from State lands.

The Department of Administration, acting on behalf of the State, for the purpose of discovering State lands, may, with the approval of the Governor and Council of State, pay any person, firm or corporation who shall provide information that leads to the successful reclamation of any swamplands or vacant and unappropriated lands of the State, a reward equal to one percent (1%) of the appraised value of the reclaimed land, or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever sum is less. All expenses incurred by the Department pursuant to this subsection shall be paid from the State Land Fund, unless otherwise provided by the General Assembly.

The Department of Administration, acting on behalf of the State, may, with the approval of the Governor and Council of State, pay any person, firm or corporation who shall provide information that leads to a successful monetary recovery by the State from any person, firm or corporation who wrongfully cuts or removes timber from State lands, a reward equal to one percent (1%) of the amount of said monetary recovery, or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever sum is less. All expenses incurred by the Department pursuant to this subsection shall be paid from said monetary recovery, unless otherwise provided by the General Assembly.

No State employee or official, or other public employee or official, shall be eligible for a reward pursuant to subsections (a) or (b) of this section for providing any information obtained in the normal course of his or her official duties.

History.

1979, c. 742, s. 1.